Florida, session 2026, HB5403.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
54
55 Section 1. Section 944.751, Florida Statutes, is created
56 to read:
57 944.751 Correctional facilities capital improvement.—
58 (1) LEGISLATIVE INTENT.—The Legislature recognizes the
59 critical fixed capital outlay needs of the department.
60 Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to provide
61 funding through cash payments or proceeds of bonds distributed
62 under this section to address these needs.
63 (2) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENT FUNDING.—Notwithstanding s. 2,
64 chapter 2025-207, Laws of Florida, beginning in the 2026-2027
65 fiscal year and each fiscal year through 2066-2067, in lieu of
66 the transfer to the State Board of Administration for the Debt
67 Reduction Program, the Legislature shall appropriate $250
68 million in recurring funds from the General Revenue Fund to the
69 department to develop and implement a capital improvement plan
70 for new and existing correctional facilities.
71 (3) USE OF FUNDS.—From the specific amount appropriated
72 for capital improvement projects each fiscal year, the
73 department must use the funds in the following order of
74 priority:
75 (a) First, for the payment of debt service or funding of
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5403-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5403 2026
76 debt service reserve funds, rebate obligations, or other amounts
77 payable with respect to bonds issued pursuant to this section.
78 (b) Second, to address the department's critical facility
79 needs, including, but not limited to, the construction of new
80 facilities or the maintenance and repair of existing facilities
81 of the department as appropriated in the General Appropriations
82 Act.
83 (4) NEW CORRECTIONAL INSTITUTION AND HOSPITAL UNIT.—
84 Beginning on July 1, 2026, the department shall begin the
85 planning and design phase for the construction of one new 4,800-
86 bed correctional institution and one new 600-bed hospital unit
87 that will include mental health services. The department shall
88 seek available state or local land for construction of the
89 facility, including existing prison sites. The site must be
90 located where the labor market, potential labor pool, and other
91 factors such as commute distance and cost of living are
92 favorable to provide a sufficient workforce for staffing the
93 facility. If state or locally owned land is not available, funds
94 may be used for purchase of land.
95 (5) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS.—
96 (a) The department shall include recommendations for the
97 use of funds in its annual legislative budget request.
98 (b) For any project costing more than $5 million, the
99 department shall contract with a construction management entity
100 that will be responsible for scheduling and coordinating both
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5403-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5403 2026
101 the design and construction phases of the project.
102 (c) Upon the completion of construction of any new
103 correctional institutions, the department shall submit a
104 recommendation to the Legislature to provide options for the
105 closure of existing facilities that are perpetually understaffed
106 or continue to present excessive repair and renovation costs.
107 (6) BONDING AUTHORITY.—
108 (a) The Division of Bond Finance of the State Board of
109 Administration is authorized to issue bonds to finance the cost
110 of constructing a new correctional facility. Bonds shall not be
111 issued for maintenance or repair of existing facilities.
112 (b) Bonds issued pursuant to this subsection are payable
113 from the funds appropriated and transferred pursuant to this
114 section.
115 (c) The department shall request that the Division of Bond
116 Finance issue bonds authorized by this section in accordance
117 with the General Appropriations Act. The Division of Bond
118 Finance shall issue such bonds pursuant to the State Bond Act.
119 (d) Except for bonds issued to refund previously issued
120 bonds, a series of bonds may not be issued pursuant to this
121 section unless such bonds are approved and the debt service for
122 the remainder of the fiscal year in which the bonds are issued
123 is specifically appropriated in the General Appropriations Act.
124 (7) FINANCING OVERSIGHT COMMITTEE.—To ensure that the
125 funds, including any bond proceeds, are spent in an efficient
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5403-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 5403 2026
126 and responsible manner, a financing oversight committee is
127 created.
128 (a) The committee must include a representative from the
129 Senate, the House of Representatives, the Office of Policy and
130 Budget in the Executive Office of the Governor, the department,
131 and the Division of Bond Finance.
132 (b) The committee shall recommend the most cost-beneficial
133 and effective financing methods to meet the needs of the
134 department for any new capital facility construction.
135 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb5403-00